Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.230

Administrative procedure act application.

The proceedings for denying license applications, issuing cease and desist orders, suspending or revoking licenses, and imposing civil penalties or other remedies issued pursuant to this chapter and any appeal therefrom or review thereof shall be governed by the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1994 c 33 s 16; 1993 c 468 s 10.]

NOTES:

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.